da: Medie for maleri: Akryl; Airbrush; Alkyd; Kasein; Trækul; Collage; Digital; Farve; Ægtempera; Emalje; Enkaustisk; Fresco; Gouache; Grafit; Blæk; Latex; Markør; Blandede medier; Olie; Pastel; Harpiks; Spraymaling; Sumi-e; Tempera; Teksturerende pasta; Vandblandbar olie; Akvarel; Andet
zh-CN: 绘画媒介: 丙烯酸; 喷枪; 醇酸; 酪蛋白; 木炭; 拼贴; 数字; 染料; 蛋彩; 珐琅; 蜡; 壁画; 水粉; 石墨; 油墨; 乳胶; 马克笔; 混合媒介; 油; 粉彩; 树脂; 喷漆; 墨绘; 蛋彩; 纹理膏; 水混溶性油; 水彩; 其他
es: Medio de pintura: Acrílico; Aerógrafo; Alquídico; Caseína; Carbón; Collage; Digital; Colorante; Temple al huevo; Esmalte; Encáustico; Fresco; Témpera; Grafito; Tinta; Látex; Marcador; Técnica mixta; Aceite; Pastel; Resina; Pintura en aerosol; Sumi-e; Temple; Pasta texturizante; Aceite miscible en agua; Acuarela; Otros
ro-RO: Mediu pentru pictură: Acrilic; Aerograf; Alchidic; Cazeină; Cărbune; Colaj; Digital; Vopsea; Tempera pe bază de ou; Email; Cerneală penetrantă; Fresco; Guașă; Grafit; Cerneală; Latex; Marker; Tehnică mixtă; Ulei; Pastel; Rășină; Vopsea spray; Sumi-e; Tempera; Pastă de texturare; Ulei miscibil cu apă; Acuarelă; Altele
nb: Malingsmedium: Akryl; Airbrush; Alkyd; Kasein; Kull; Kollasj; Digital; Fargestoff; Eggtempera; Emalje; Enkaustisk; Fresko; Gouache; Grafitt; Blekk; Lateks; Markør; Blandede medier; Olje; Pastell; Harpiks; Spraymaling; Sumi-e; Tempera; Teksturpasta; Vannblandbar olje; Akvarell; Annet
el: Μέσο ζωγραφικής: Ακρυλικό; Αερογράφος; Αλκυδική ρητίνη; Καζεΐνη; Ξυλάνθρακας; Κολάζ; Ψηφιακός; Βαφή; Αυγοτέμπερα; Σμάλτο; Εγκαυστική; Τοιχογραφία; Γκουάς; Γραφίτης; Μελάνι; Λάτεξ; Μαρκαδόρος; Μικτά μέσα; Έλαιο; Παστέλ; Ρητίνη; Βαφή με σπρέι; Sumi-e; Τέμπερα; Πάστα υφής; Αναμίξιμο με νερό λάδι; Υδροχρωμάτων; Άλλο
it: Mezzo pittorico: Acrilico; Airbrush; Alkyd; Caseina; Carbone; Collage; Digitale; Tintura; Tempera all'uovo; Smalto; Encaustica; Affresco; Guazzo; Grafite; Inchiostro; Lattice; Pennarello; Tecnica mista; Olio; Pastello; Resina; Vernice spray; Sumi-e; Tempera; Pasta texturizzante; Olio miscelabile con acqua; Acquerello; Altro
lt-LT: Tapybos priemonės: Akrilas; Dažų purkštuvas; Alkidas; Kazeinas; Medžio anglis; Koliažas; Skaitmeninė; Dažai; Kiaušinio tempera; Emalis; Enkaustiniai; Freska; Guašas; Grafitas; Rašalas; Lateksas; Žymeklis; Mišri medija; Aliejiniai; Pastelė; Derva; Purškiami dažai; Sumije; Tempera; Tekstūruojanti pasta; Su vandeniu maišomi aliejiniai; Akvarelė; Kita
sl-SI: Slikarski medij: Akril; Zračni čopič; Alkid; Kazein; Oglje; Kolaž; Digitalno; Barva; Jajčna tempera; Emajl; Enkavstična; Freska; Gvaš; Grafit; Črnilo; Latex; Flomaster; Mešana tehnika; Olje; Pastel; Smola; Barva v spreju; Slikanje s črnilom; Tempera; Pasta za teksturiranje; Olje, ki se meša z vodo; Akvarel; Drugo
sv: Målningsmaterial: Akryl; Airbrush; Alkyd; Kasein; Träkol; Collage; Digital; Färgämne; Äggtempera; Emalj; Enkaustisk; Fresk; Gouache; Grafit; Bläck; Latex; Markeringspenna; Mixade media; Olja; Pastell; Harts; Sprayfärg; Sumi-e; Tempera; Texturerande pasta; Vattenblandbar olja; Vattenfärg; Övrigt
th: สื่อในงานจิตรกรรม: อะคริลิก; แอร์บรัช; อัลคิด; เคซีน; ถ่านไม้; คอลลาจ; ดิจิทัล; สีย้อม; สีฝุ่นเทมเพอรากับไข่; สีสูตรอีนาเมล; การเขียนสีขี้ผึ้งร้อน; ปูนเปียก; สีกวอช; แกรไฟท์; หมึก; ลาเท็กซ์; ปากกาเคมี; สื่อผสม; น้ำมัน; พาสเทล; เรซิน; สีสเปรย์; หมึกซูมิ; สีฝุ่นเทมเพอรา; ดินเปียกสำหรับขึ้นรูป; สีน้ำมันผสมน้ำ; สีน้ำ; อื่นๆ
ru: Техника рисования: Акрил; Аэрография; Алкидная смола; Казеин; Древесный уголь; Коллаж; Цифровой; Краситель; Яичная темпера; Эмаль; Энкаустика; Фреска; Гуашь; Графит; Чернила; Латекс; Маркер; Смешанная техника; Масло; Пастель; Смола; Аэрозольная краска; Суми-э; Темпера; Текстурирующая паста; Водорастворимое масло; Акварель; Другое
nl: Schildermedium: Acryl; Airbrush; Alkyd; Caseïne; Houtskool; Collage; Digitaal; Kleurstof; Eitempera; Email; Encaustiek; Fresco; Gouache; Grafiet; Inkt; Latex; Marker; Gemengde media; Olie; Pastel; Hars; Spuitverf; Sumi-e; Tempera; Textuurpasta; Watermengbare olie; Aquarel; Andere
en: Painting medium: Acrylic; Airbrush; Alkyd; Casein; Charcoal; Collage; Digital; Dye; Egg tempera; Enamel; Encaustic; Fresco; Gouache; Graphite; Ink; Latex; Marker; Mixed media; Oil; Pastel; Resin; Spray paint; Sumi-e; Tempera; Texturizing paste; Water miscible oil; Watercolor; Other
fr: Moyen de peinture: Acrylique; Aérographe; Alkyde; Caséine; Charbon; Collage; Numérique; Teinture; Tempera à l'œuf; Émaillée; Encaustique; Fresque; Gouache; Graphite; Encre; Latex; Marqueur; Technique mixte; Huile; Pastel; Résine; Peinture en aérosol; Sumi-e; Tempera; Pâte texturisante; Huile miscible à l’eau; Aquarelle; Autre
pt-PT: Técnica de pintura: Acrílico; Aerógrafo; Alquílica; Caseína; Carvão; Colagem; Digital; Tinta; Têmpera de ovo; Esmalte; Encáustica; Pintura a fresco; Guache; Grafite; Tinta; Látex; Marcador; Técnica mista; Óleo; Pastel; Resina; Tinta em spray; Sumi-e; Têmpera; Pasta para esculpir; Óleo miscível em água; Aguarela; Outro
ja: 絵画の媒体: アクリル; エアーブラシ; アルキド樹脂; カゼイン; 木炭; コラージュ; デジタル; 染料; 卵テンペラ; エナメル; エンコースティック; フレスコ; ガッシュ; グラファイト; インク; ラテックス; マーカー; ミクストメディア; オイルペイント; パステル; レジン; スプレー塗装; 墨絵; テンペラ; テクスチャライジングペースト; 水混和性油絵の具; 水彩; その他
pl: Środek malarski: Akryl; Aerograf; Alkid; Kazeina; Węgiel; Kolaż; Cyfrowy; Barwnik; Tempera jajeczna; Emalia; Enkaustyka; Fresk; Gwasz; Grafit; Tusz; Lateks; Marker; Techniki mieszane; Olej; Pastele; Żywica; Farba natryskowa; Sumi-e; Tempera; Pasta teksturująca; Olej mieszany z wodą; Akwarela; Inne
cs: Malířské médium: Akryl; Airbrush; Alkyd; Kasein; Dřevěné uhlí; Koláž; Digitální; Barvivo; Vaječná tempera; Email; Enkaustika; Freska; Kvaš; Grafit; Inkoust; Latex; Popisovač; Smíšená technika; Olej; Pastel; Pryskyřice; Barva ve spreji; Sumi-e; Tempera; Texturizační pasta; Olej mísitelný s vodou; Akvarelová barva; Jiné
de: Maltechnik: Acryl; Airbrush; Alkyd; Kasein; Holzkohle; Collage; Digital; Farbstoff; Eitempera; Emaillelack; Enkaustik; Fresco; Gouache; Graphit; Tinte; Latex; Marker; Gemischte Medien; Öl; Pastell; Harz; Sprühfarbe; Sumi-e; Tempera; Strukturpaste; Wassermischbare Ölfarbe; Aquarellfarbe; Sonstiges
sk-SK: Maľovacie médium: Akryl; Pištoľ Airbrush; Alkyd; Kazeín; Drevené uhlie; Koláž; Digitálny; Farbivo; Vaječná tempera; Smalt; Enkaustika; Freska; Gvaš; Grafit; Atrament; Latex; Fixka; Zmiešané médiá; Olej; Pastel; Živica; Farba v spreji; Sumi-e; Tempera; Texturizačná pasta; Olej miešateľný s vodou; Akvarel; Iné
hr-HR: Slikarski medij: Akril; Airbrush; Alkid; Kazein; Ugljen; Kolaž; Digitalni; Boja; Tempera od jaja; Emajl; Enkaustični; Freska; Gvaš; Grafit; Tinta; Lateks; Marker; Mješovita tehnika; Ulje; Pastel; Smola; Boja u spreju; Sumi-e; Tempera; Pasta za teksturiranje; Ulje koje se miješa s vodom; Akvarel; Ostalo
zh-TW: 繪畫媒介: 壓克力; 噴槍; 醇酸; 酪蛋白; 活性碳; 拼貼畫; 數位; 染料; 蛋彩畫; 琺瑯; 蠟; 壁畫; 不透明水彩畫; 石墨; 墨水; 乳膠; 麥克筆; 複合媒材; 油; 粉彩; 樹脂; 噴漆; 水墨畫; 蛋彩畫; 塑形劑; 水混溶油; 水彩; 其他
hu: Festőközeg: Akril; Festékszóró; Alkid; Kazein; Faszén; Kollázs; Digitális; Festék; Tojástempera; Zománc; Beégetett; Freskó; Gouache; Grafit; Tinta; Latex; Jelölő; Vegyes technika; Olaj; Pasztell; Gyanta; Szórófesték; Sumi-e; Tempera; Texturáló paszta; Vízzel elegyedő olaj; Vízfesték; Egyéb
ko: 그림 매체: 아크릴; 에어브러쉬; 알키드; 카세인; 차콜; 콜라주; 디지털; 염료; 에그 템페라; 에나멜; 엔코스틱; 프레스코; 과슈; 흑연; 잉크; 라텍스; 마커; 혼합 매체; 오일; 파스텔; 수지; 스프레이 페인트; 수미에; 템페라; 텍스처라이징 페이스트; 물 혼화성 오일; 수채화; 기타
tr: Boyama aracı: Akrilik; Boya tabancası; Alkit; Kazein; Kömür; Kolaj; Dijital; Boya; Yumurta Zamklıboyası; Emaye; Yakımlı; Fresk; Guaj boya; Grafit; Mürekkep; Lateks; İşaretçi; Karışık teknik; Yağ; Pastel; Reçine; Sprey boya; Sumi-e; Zamklıboya; Doku macunu; Suyla karışabilen yağ; Suluboya; Diğer
vi: Chất liệu hội họa: Acrylic; Súng phun sơn; Alkyd; Casein; Than củi; Nghệ thuật cắt dán ảnh; Kỹ thuật số; In nhuộm; Sơn keo trứng; Men; Vẽ khắc nung; Bích họa; Bột màu; Than chì; Mực; Mủ cao su; Bút đánh dấu; Phương tiện hỗn hợp; Dầu; Phấn màu; Nhựa resin; Sơn phun; Sumi-e; Sơn keo; Sáp tạo kiểu; Dầu hòa tan trong nước; Màu nước; Khác
bg-BG: Среда за рисуване: Акрил; Аерограф; Алкид; Казеин; Въглен; Колаж; Цифров; Багрило; Яйчена темпера; Емайл; Енкаустика; Стенопис; Гваш; Графит; Мастило; Латекс; Маркер; Смесена техника; Масло; Пастел; Смола; Спрей боя; Sumi-e; Темпера; Паста за текстуриране; Смесващо се с вода масло; Акварел; Други
pt-BR: Meio de pintura: Acrílico; Aerógrafo; Alkyd; Caseína; Carvão; Colagens; Digital; Tintura; Tempera de ovo; Esmalte; Encáustica; Fresco; Guache; Grafite; Tinta; Látex; Marcador; Mídia mista; Óleo; Pastel; Resina; Pintura em spray; Sumi-e; Tempera; Pasta texturizante; Óleo miscível em água; Tinta de aquarela; Outro
fi: Maalausväline: Akryyli; Airbrush; Alkydi; Kaseiini; Puuhiili; Kollaasi; Digitaalinen; Väriaine; Munaöljytempera; Emali; Vahamaalaus; Fresko; Guassi; Grafiitti; Muste; Lateksi; Huopakynä; Sekatekniikka; Öljyväri; Pastelli; Hartsi; Spraymaali; Sumi-e; Tempera; Tekstuuria antava tahna; Veteen sekoittuva öljy; Akvarelliväri; Muu